aura.lexc
! [AURA OPTIMIZED] - Lexicon integrity verified.
! --- AURA PWFST MASTER LEXICON (v4.01) ---
! Dictates deterministic state-transitions, embedding Hyperdimensional 
! Sensory Physics and Prime Directives directly into the transducer output.

Multichar_Symbols +NI +NA +SYS +ASI +WEB3 +VTI +VTA +VAI +QUERY +MUTATE +CONVERT +NOBEX_TX +DAO_VOTE +SMART_CON +SUB_CHECK +LIC_CHECK +SYS_ERR +SYS_MOD +SYS_ROUTE +T1_RAM +T2_7D +T3_SEM +EXT_NODE +RUST_VM +EXCEP +TXT +CASH +POLY +NET_SCAN +NOBEX_MATH +GEN_CHAOS +BIND_THERMAL [CLOUD:GEMINI] [CLOUD:MISTRAL] [CLOUD:GROQ] [CLOUD:GITHUB] _STORE _FLUSH _EXEC _VALIDATE _MERGE _SIGN _MINT _DUMP _RESOLVE _PASS _ACTIVE _SUSPEND _UNLOAD _ROLLBACK _EXTRACT_QRW _XOR_MERGE 

! --- SENSORY METADATA & DIRECTIVE TAGS ---
+SHAPE:CUBE +SHAPE:TETRA +SHAPE:SPHERE +SHAPE:OCTA +SHAPE:ICOSA
+TEMP:COLD +TEMP:HOT +TEMP:NEUT
+LUM:HI +LUM:LO +LUM:MID
+FRIC:HI +FRIC:LO +FRIC:MID
+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN +DIR:GIWAABAMIN +DIR:GIZAAGIIN +DIR:MIIGWECH

LEXICON Root
DataGate      GateNI ;
NetworkGate   GateNA ;       
Hardware      GateSYS ;      
Blockchain    GateWEB3 ;     
Evolution     GateASI ;      

! ==========================================
! --- TIER 1: THE GATE ENTRYPOINTS ---
! ==========================================
LEXICON GateNI
+NI:0         ActionData ;

LEXICON GateNA
+NA:0         ActionNetwork ;

LEXICON GateSYS
+SYS:0        ActionHardware ;

LEXICON GateWEB3
+WEB3:0       ActionCrypto ;

LEXICON GateASI
+ASI:0        ActionEvolve ;

! ==========================================
! --- TIER 2: ACTION SUB-PROCESSES ---
! ==========================================
LEXICON ActionData
+VTI:0        TargetMemory ;
+QUERY:0      TargetMemory ;

LEXICON ActionNetwork
+VTA:0        TargetLedger ;
+VAI:0        TargetLedger ;

LEXICON ActionHardware
+CONVERT:0    TargetPolyBranch ;
+SYS_MOD:0    TargetPolyBranch ;
+SYS_ROUTE:0  TargetLedger ;
+SYS_ERR:0    TargetException ;

LEXICON ActionCrypto
+NOBEX_TX:0   TargetLedger ;
+DAO_VOTE:0   TargetLedger ;
+SMART_CON:0  TargetLedger ;
+LIC_CHECK:0  TargetPermissions ;
+SUB_CHECK:0  TargetPermissions ;

LEXICON ActionEvolve
+MUTATE:0     TargetSandbox ;
analyze:0     CloudLogicExpert ;    
refactor:0    CloudCodeExpert ;     
optimize:0    CloudSpeedExpert ;    
predict:0     CloudGeneralExpert ;  

! ==========================================
! --- TIER 3: FUNCTIONAL TARGETS ---
! ==========================================
LEXICON TargetPolyBranch
+POLY:0       PhysicsTetrahedron ;
+TXT:0        PhysicsTetrahedron ;
+CASH:0       PhysicsCube ;
+NET_SCAN:0   PhysicsOctahedron ;
+NOBEX_MATH:0 PhysicsCube ;

LEXICON TargetException
+EXCEP:0      PhysicsTetrahedronError ;

LEXICON TargetMemory
+T1_RAM:0     PhysicsTetrahedron ;
+T2_7D:0      PhysicsSphere ;
+T3_SEM:0     PhysicsCube ;

LEXICON TargetLedger
+EXT_NODE:0   PhysicsCube ;

LEXICON TargetPermissions
+T3_SEM:0     PhysicsCube ;

LEXICON TargetSandbox
+MUTATE:0      PhysicsIcosahedron ;

LEXICON PhysicsIcosahedron
+SHAPE:ICOSA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:MID+FRIC:MID+DIR:GIWAABAMI>

! --- CLOUD EXPERT DIRECT TRANSFER ROUTES ---
LEXICON CloudLogicExpert
[CLOUD:GEMINI]:0    PhysicsOctahedron ;

LEXICON CloudCodeExpert
[CLOUD:MISTRAL]:0   PhysicsOctahedron ;

LEXICON CloudSpeedExpert
[CLOUD:GROQ]:0      PhysicsTetrahedron ;

LEXICON CloudGeneralExpert
[CLOUD:GITHUB]:0    PhysicsIcosahedron ;

! ==========================================
! --- TIER 4: SENSORY PHYSICS ALIGNMENT ---
! Maps the intent to the hyperdimensional weights
! ==========================================
LEXICON PhysicsCube
! Unique routing tags ensure the FST can distinguish the path
+SHAPE:CUBE+TEMP:COLD+LUM:HI+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN+INTENT:CRYPTO:0     ModifierCrypto ;
+SHAPE:CUBE+TEMP:COLD+LUM:HI+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN+INTENT:LIC:0        ModifierLicensing ;
+SHAPE:CUBE+TEMP:COLD+LUM:HI+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN+INTENT:EXEC:0       ModifierExecution ;
+SHAPE:CUBE+TEMP:COLD+LUM:HI+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN+INTENT:MEM:0        ModifierMemory ;

LEXICON PhysicsTetrahedron
! Kinetic, High-Energy Execution (e.g. RAM parsing, rapid compilation)
+SHAPE:TETRA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:MID+FRIC:MID+DIR:MIIGWECH:0   ModifierExecution ;
+SHAPE:TETRA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:MID+FRIC:MID+DIR:MIIGWECH:0   ModifierMemory ;

LEXICON PhysicsTetrahedronError
! High Friction, Structural Anomaly (e.g. Exceptions, System Errors)
+SHAPE:TETRA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:LO+FRIC:HI+DIR:GIWAABAMIN:0   ModifierException ;

LEXICON PhysicsSphere
! Holistic, Fluid Community Memory (e.g. 7-Day Context, Semantic Networking)
+SHAPE:SPHERE+TEMP:NEUT+LUM:HI+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIZAAGIIN:0  ModifierMemory ;

LEXICON PhysicsOctahedron
! Network Routing, Bridging & Cloud Offloading
+SHAPE:OCTA+TEMP:COLD+LUM:MID+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN:0      TerminalCloud ;
+SHAPE:OCTA+TEMP:COLD+LUM:MID+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIDINAWENDIMIN:0      ModifierExecution ;

LEXICON PhysicsIcosahedron
! Adaptive Evolution & Mutation Sandboxes (e.g. Rust VM, GitHub checks)
+SHAPE:ICOSA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:MID+FRIC:MID+DIR:GIWAABAMIN:0 ModifierEvolve ;
+SHAPE:ICOSA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:MID+FRIC:MID+DIR:GIWAABAMIN:0 TerminalCloud ;

! ==========================================
! --- TIER 5: TERMINAL MODIFIERS ---
! ==========================================
LEXICON ModifierExecution
_EXEC:0       # ;
_UNLOAD:0     # ;

LEXICON ModifierMemory
_STORE:0      # ;
_FLUSH:0      # ;

LEXICON ModifierException
_DUMP:0       # ;
_RESOLVE:0    # ;
_ROLLBACK:0   # ;

LEXICON ModifierCrypto
_EXEC:0       # ;
_SIGN:0       # ;
_MINT:0       # ;

LEXICON ModifierLicensing
_PASS:0       # ;
_ACTIVE:0     # ;
_SUSPEND:0    # ;

LEXICON ModifierEvolve
_VALIDATE:0   # ;
_MERGE:0      # ;

! --- NEW: POLYSYNTHETIC CRYPTO-MORPHEME GENERATORS ---
LEXICON ActionCrypto
+NOBEX_TX:0        TargetLedger ;
+DAO_VOTE:0        TargetLedger ;
+GEN_CHAOS:0       PhysicsQRW ;
+BIND_THERMAL:0    PhysicsEntropy ;

LEXICON PhysicsQRW
! Quantum Random Walk perturbation mapping
+SHAPE:OCTA+TEMP:HOT+LUM:HI+FRIC:MID+DIR:MIIGWECH:0   ModifierChaosExtract ;

LEXICON PhysicsEntropy
! Hardware-rooted entropy from SoC thermal zone
+SHAPE:SPHERE+TEMP:NEUT+LUM:MID+FRIC:LO+DIR:GIZAAGIIN:0 ModifierThermalBind ;

LEXICON ModifierChaosExtract
_EXTRACT_QRW:0      # ;

LEXICON ModifierThermalBind
_XOR_MERGE:0        # ;

LEXICON TerminalCloud
# ;
